test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-list_3st_id_gt-norm.gen.yaml
 
  
    
    njaddodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njaddod
    njadestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njaddeest
    njadettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njaddeet
    njadostiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njaddoost
    njagottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njaggoot
    njalaniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njallaan
    njalhostiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njalhoost
    njalpettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njalppeet
    njalčattiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njalččaat
    njamasiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njammaas
    njamestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njaameest
    njavhâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njaavhâst
    njavâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njaavvât
    njeeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njiäjám
    njeeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njiäjá
    njibžettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njibžettâm
    njibžâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njiibžâst
    njielâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njielâst
    njivottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njivvoot
    njivádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njivváád
    njiäládiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njiäláád
    njiäpčuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njiäpčut
    njiäpčááttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njiäpčát
    njocârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njooccârd
    njolgestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njolgeest
    njolpettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njolppeet
    njolpáttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njolppáát
    njommâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njommâs
    njomâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njoomât
    njorijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njoorijd
    njorttâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njorttâd
    njoveldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njooveeld
    njovhâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njoovhât
    njočârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njooččârd
    njulpettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njulppeet
    njulppâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njulppâs
    njuorâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuorâd
    njuorâsmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njuorâsm
    njuoskâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuoskâš
    njuovâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuovâd
    njuvgâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuuvgâg
    njuvâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuuvâst
    njuálccudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuálccut
    njuálcáttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuálccát
    njuáludiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuálud
    njuálustiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuálust
    njuámudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuámmud
    njuámuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuámut
    njuámádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuámmád
    njuárgustiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuárgust
    njuárguttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuárgut
    njuárustiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuárust
    njuškiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuškit
    njuškodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuškood
    njuškottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuškoot
    njyeskistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njyeskist
    njálgásmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njáálgásm
    njálmádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njáálmád
    njápčááttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njápčát
    njárbudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njáárbud
    njávgádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njáávgád
    njävhistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njäävhist
    skalijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skaalijd
    skavadiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skaavaad
    skelmušiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skelmuš
    skerčijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skeerčijd
    skerčâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skeerčâg
    skilettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skiileet
    skilijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skiilijd
    skircettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skircceet
    skirnádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skirnáád
    skirviittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skirviittâm
    skitârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skiittârd
    skiärustiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skiärrust
    skižestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skiižeest
    skičijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skiičijd
    skiđârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skiiđârd
    skolijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skoolijd
    skolkkâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skolkkâl
    skovijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skoovijd
    skođâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skoođâst
    skuiperdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skuuiperd
    skuirâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skuuirâg
    skulčottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skulččoot
    skurnáttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skurnáát
    skurčâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skuurčâg
    skuvgááttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skuvgát
    skuvgâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skuvgâl
    skuálkuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skuálkut
    skuávhádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skuávhád
    skuávkkááttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skuávkkát
    skuážurdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skuážžurd
    skužestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skužžeest
    skuđálgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skuuđáálg
    skučâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skuuččâg
    skyennidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skyennid
    skávustiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skáávust
    smavâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: smaavvâd
    smierettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: smiereet
    smietâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: smiettâd
    smiärgááttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: smiärgát
    sniljáástiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sniljást
    snipottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: snippoot
    snjagottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: snjaggoot
    snjirriittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: snjirrit
    snjogâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: snjooggâst
    snorâniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: snoorrân
    čokánistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čokánistám
    snuotârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: snuotârd
    snuvlâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: snuuvlâg
    spaihâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: spaaihâst
    sparrodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sparrod
    spejâldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: speejâld
    spiekâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: spiekkâst
    sporijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: spoorijd
    sporkkâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sporkkâl
    spuáhuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: spuáhut
    stajediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: staajeed
    stergâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: steergâg
    stilčottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stilččoot
    stirccááttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stirccát
    stiämmááttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stiämmát
    stokkádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stokkád
    stuimáskiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stuuimásk
    stulčádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stulččáád
    sturccâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sturccâd
    stuárášiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stuárráš
    stuŋgiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stuŋgit
    styerediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: styereed
    stávrudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stáávrud
    stávruttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stáávrut
    stäjediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stääjeed
    stäjidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stääjid
    škiŋijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: škiiŋijd
    škorijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: škoorijd
    škurijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: škuurijd
    škurnádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: škurnáád
    šladârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šlaaddârd
    šlamâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šlaamâd
    šlamâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šlaamât
    šlarvâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šlarvâd
    šlimâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šliimmâl
    šliämádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šliämáád
    šliäđguttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šliäđgut
    špiäiguttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: špiäigut
    šliäđgádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šliäđgáád
    hiäibustiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hiäibust
    hiäibuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hiäibut
    hiäiluttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hiäilut
    hiäimustiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hiäimust
    šlobârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šloobbârd
    šlundodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šlundod
    šluogâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šluoggâst
    šnjirijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šniirijd
    šnjirriittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šnjirrit
    špuáhuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: špuáhut
    špuákkááttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: špuákkááttâm
    vuáisádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuáisád
    vuáivuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuáivut
    puáibildiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puáibild
    puáidudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puáidud
    puáidášiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puáidáš
    kuáikkusiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuáikkus
    nuáigistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuáigist
    ruáinudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruáinud
    ruáiskuliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruáiskulâm
    uáinistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uáinist
    uáivildiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uáivild

    čuoigâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuoigâd
    čuoigâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuoigât
    juoigâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juoigâst
    kuoirâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuoirâš
    luoihâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luoihât
    ruoinâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruoinâš
    vuoidâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuoidâl
    vuoidâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuoidâst
    vuoiŋâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuoiŋâst


 
